apertium-ca-it/apertium-ca-it.ca.dix
    <pardef n="ven/dre__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dríem</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dria</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dríeu</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dries</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>drien</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dria</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>drem</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dré</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dreu</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dràs</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dran</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>drà</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>guéssim</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>gués</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>guéssiu</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>guessis</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>guessin</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>gués</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ent</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ent</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>guérem</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>guí</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>guéreu</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>gueres</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>gueren</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>gué</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>guem</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>guem</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eu</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eu</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>guin</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>guen</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>guin</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>guen</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>gui</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ga</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>gui</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ga</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dre</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dre</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íem</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ia</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íeu</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ies</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ien</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ia</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>guéssim</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>guérem</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>gués</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>guera</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>guéssiu</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>guéreu</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>guessis</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>gueres</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>guessin</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>gueren</l> 
        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>gués</l> 

<e lm="vendre"><i>ven</i><par n="ven/dre__vblex"/></e>
